test/src/morphology/V-vaoma72_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `vaoma1: # Verb (72) `vaoma1 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `vaoma+V+Inf/mA: `vaoma
     `vaoma+V+Inf: `vaodaq
     `vaoma+V+ActPrtPrc: `vaonuq
     `vaoma+V+PssPrtPrc: vaot
     `vaoma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: vao
     `vaoma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: vaos
     `vaoma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `vaio
     `vaoma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: `vaio
